Utah statutes.
11-36a-401.   Impact fee enactment.

(1) (a)  A local political subdivision or private entity wishing to impose impact fees shall pass an impact fee enactment in accordance with Section 11-36a-402.

(b)  An impact fee imposed by an impact fee enactment may not exceed the highest fee justified by the impact fee analysis.

(2)  An impact fee enactment may not take effect until 90 days after the day on which the impact fee enactment is approved.



Enacted by Chapter 47, 2011 General Session

